Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 47.60, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the terms defined have the meanings given them: (a) "Consumer small loan" is a loan transactionnew text begin , whether recourse or nonrecourse,new text end in which cash is advanced to a borrower for the borrower's own personal, family, or household purpose. A consumer small loan is a short-term, unsecured loan to be repaid in a single installment. The cash advance of a consumer small loan is equal to or less than $350. A consumer small loan includes an indebtedness evidenced by but not limited to a promissory note deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end agreement to defer the presentation of a personal check deleted text begin for a feedeleted text end new text begin , or authorization or preauthorization of an account transfernew text end . (b) "Consumer small loan lender" is a financial institution as defined in section 47.59 or a business entity registered with the commissioner and engaged in the business ofnew text begin offering, soliciting, arranging,new text end makingnew text begin , or facilitatingnew text end consumer small loans.new text begin Consumer small loan lender business activity includes but is not limited to any substantial involvement to market, generate leads for, underwrite, service, or collect a consumer small loan. A consumer small loan lender includes an entity without a physical location in Minnesota that makes a consumer small loan to a resident of Minnesota electronically via the Internet or through a mobile application.new text end (c) "Annual percentage rate" means a measure of the cost of credit, expressed as a yearly rate, that relates the amount and timing of value received by the consumer to the amount and timing of payments made. Annual percentage rate includes all interest, finance charges, and fees. The annual percentage rate must be determined in accordance with either the actuarial method or the United States Rule method. new text begin (d) "Fee" means an amount, other than interest or a finance charge, in addition to the loan principal that is charged, demanded, solicited, requested, or paid by the borrower to the consumer small loan lender in connection with the transaction. Fee includes but is not limited to a membership, subscription, participation, convenience, or expediting fee, or a tip, contribution, or donation. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 47.60, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Filing. Before a business entity other than a financial institution as defined by section 47.59 engages in the business of making consumer small loans to Minnesota residents, the business entity shall file with the commissioner as a consumer small loan lender. The filing must be on a form prescribed by the commissioner together with a fee of $250 for each place of business and contain the following information in addition to the information required by the commissioner: (1) evidence that the filer has available for the operation of the business at the location specified, liquid assets of at least $50,000; and (2) a biographical statement on the principal person responsible for the operation and management of the business to be certified. Revocation of the filing is the same as in the case of a regulated lender license in section 56.09. deleted text begin For purposes of this subdivision, "business entity" includes one that does not have a physical location in Minnesota that makes a consumer small loan electronically via the Internet. deleted text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 47.601, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. (b) "Annual percentage rate" has the meaning given in section 47.60, subdivision 1. (c) "Borrower" means an individual who obtains a consumer short-term loan primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. (d) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of commerce. (e) "Consumer short-term loan" means a loannew text begin , whether recourse or nonrecourse,new text end to a borrower which has a principal amount, or an advance on a credit limit, of $1,300 or less and requiresnew text begin , schedules, or sets a default expectation through authorization, preauthorization, or otherwise ofnew text end a minimum payment within 60 days of loan origination or credit advance of more than 25 percent of the principal balance or credit advance. For the purposes of this section, each new advance of money to a borrower under a consumer short-term loan agreement constitutes a new consumer short-term loan. A "consumer short-term loan" does not include any transaction made under chapter 325J or a loan made by a consumer short-term lender where, in the event of default on the loan, the sole recourse for recovery of the amount owed, other than a lawsuit for damages for the debt, is to proceed against physical goods pledged by the borrower as collateral for the loan. (f) "Consumer short-term lender" means an individual or entity engaged in the business of new text begin offering, soliciting, facilitating, new text end makingnew text begin ,new text end or arranging consumer short-term loans, other than a state or federally chartered bank, savings bank, or credit union. deleted text begin For the purposes of this paragraph, arranging consumer short-term loansdeleted text end new text begin Consumer short-term lender business activitynew text end includes but is not limited to any substantial involvement in deleted text begin facilitating,deleted text end marketing, lead-generating, underwriting, servicing, or collecting consumer short-term loans.new text begin A consumer short-term lender includes an entity without a physical location in Minnesota that makes a consumer short-term loan to a resident of Minnesota electronically via the Internet or through a mobile application.new text end new text begin (g) "Fee" means an amount, other than interest or a finance charge, in addition to the loan principal that is charged, demanded, solicited, requested, or paid by the borrower to the consumer short-term lender in connection with the transaction. Fee includes but is not limited to a membership, subscription, participation, convenience, or expediting fee, or a tip, contribution, or donation. new text end